Tennessee statutes. Title 59 Mines And Mining
Part 1

Primacy and Reclamation Act of Tennessee [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-101. Short title. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Primacy and Reclamation Act of Tennessee.”

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-102. Part definitions. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Affected area”:

Means any land or water surface area that is used to facilitate, or is physically altered by, coal surface mining and reclamation operations; and

Includes:

The disturbed area;

Any area upon which coal surface mining and reclamation operations are conducted;

Any adjacent lands, the use of which is incidental to coal surface mining and reclamation operations;

All areas covered by new or existing roads used to gain access to, or for hauling coal to or from, coal surface mining and reclamation operations, unless the road is a maintained public road;

Any area covered by surface excavations, workings, impoundments, dams, ventilation shafts, entryways, refuse banks, dumps, stockpiles, overburden piles, spoil banks, culm banks, tailings, holes or depressions, repair areas, storage areas, or shipping areas;

Any areas upon which are sited structures, facilities, or other property or materials on the surface resulting from, or incidental to, coal surface mining and reclamation operations; and

The area located above underground workings;

“Approximate original contour” means that surface configuration achieved by backfilling and grading of the mined area so that the reclaimed area, including any terracing or access roads, closely resembles the general surface configuration of the land prior to mining, and blends into and complements the drainage pattern of the surrounding terrain, with all highwalls and spoil piles eliminated;

“Board” means the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources, established by § 69-3-104;

“Commerce” means trade, traffic, commerce, transportation, transmission, or communication among the several states or between a state and any other place outside it, or between points in the same state which directly or indirectly affect interstate commerce;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of environment and conservation or the commissioner's designee;

“Department” means the department of environment and conservation;

“Imminent danger to the health and safety of the public” means the existence of any condition or practice, or any violation of a permit or other requirement of this part in a surface coal mining and reclamation operation, which condition, practice, or violation could reasonably be expected to cause substantial physical harm to persons outside the permit area before the condition, practice, or violation could be abated. A reasonable expectation of death or serious injury before abatement exists if a rational person, subjected to the same conditions or practices giving rise to the peril, would not expose himself or herself to the danger during the time necessary for abatement;

“Locality” means the county where all or the majority of a surface coal mining and reclamation operation is located;

“Office” means the office of surface mining reclamation and enforcement, established by the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (30 U.S.C. § 1201, et seq.);

“Operator” means any person, partnership, or corporation engaged in surface coal mining who removes or intends to remove more than two hundred fifty (250) tons of coal from the earth by surface coal mining within twelve (12) consecutive months in any one (1) location;

“Permit” means a permit to conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations issued by the commissioner;

“Permit applicant” or “applicant” means a person applying for a permit;

“Permit area” means the area of land indicated on the approved map submitted by the permit applicant with the applicant's application, which area of land is covered by the operator's bond as required by this part;

“Permittee” means a person holding a permit;

“Person”:

Means an individual, partnership, association, society, governmental agency or entity, joint stock company, firm, company, corporation, or other business organization; and

Does not mean the board, department, and their officials and employees acting in their official capacity;

“Prime farmland” has the same meaning as that previously prescribed by the secretary of agriculture on the basis of such factors as moisture availability, temperature regime, chemical balance, permeability, surface layer composition, susceptibility to flooding, and erosion characteristics; which historically has been used for intensive agricultural purposes; and as published in 7 CFR 657.5;

“Reclamation plan” means a plan submitted by an applicant for a permit under § 59-8-109, that sets forth a plan for reclamation of the proposed surface coal mining and reclamation operations;

“Secretary” means the secretary of the interior;

“Spoil bank” means the overburden as it is piled or deposited in the process of mining;

“Surface coal mining and reclamation operations” means surface coal mining operations and all activities necessary and incidental to the reclamation of surface coal mining operations occurring on and after the effective date of this part [see the Compiler's Notes];

“Surface coal mining operations” means:

(a) Activities conducted on the surface of lands in connection with a surface coal mine; or

The activities:

Surface operations and surface impacts incident to an underground coal mine that are subject to §59-8-111;

Include excavation for the purpose of obtaining coal, including such common methods as contour, strip, auger, cross ridge, box cut, open pit, and area mining; the uses of explosives and blasting; and in situ distillation or retorting, leaching, or other chemical or physical processing; and the cleaning, concentrating, or other processing or preparation, loading of coal for interstate commerce at or near the mine site; and

Do not include the extraction of coal incidental to the extraction of other minerals where coal does not exceed sixteen and two-thirds percent (16 2/3%) of the tonnage of minerals removed for purposes of commercial use or sale or coal explorations subject to § 59-8-105; and

The areas upon which the activities described in subdivision (21)(A) occur or where the activities disturb the natural land surface. “Areas” include:

Any adjacent land, the use of which is incidental to any of the activities described in subdivision (21)(A);

All lands affected by the construction of new roads or the improvement or use of existing roads to gain access to the site of any of the activities described in subdivision (21)(A) and for haulage; however, maintained public roads are not “areas”; and

Excavations, workings, impoundments, dams, ventilation shafts, entryways, refuse banks, dumps, stockpiles, overburden piles, spoil banks, culm banks, tailings, holes or depressions, repair areas, storage areas, processing areas, shipping areas, and other areas upon which are sited structures, facilities, or other property or materials on the surface, resulting from or incident to any of the activities described in subdivision (21)(A); and

“Unwarranted failure to comply” means the failure of a person, operator, or permittee to prevent the occurrence of any violation of a permit or any requirement of this part due to indifference, lack of diligence, or lack of reasonable care, or the failure to abate any violation of a permit or this part due to indifference, lack of diligence, or lack of reasonable care.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-103. Powers of commissioner and board. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

The commissioner shall:

Administer and enforce this part and rules, permits, and orders promulgated or issued under this part;

Conduct and obtain investigations, research, experiments, training programs, and demonstrations; and collect and disseminate information relating to exploration, surface mining, reclamation of disturbed lands, and control of pollution of water and soil affected by exploration and surface mining for coal;

Issue notices of violations, cease and desist orders, or other orders as authorized by this part, in the office or on-site, requiring the adoption by a person, operator, or permittee of remedial measures necessary for carrying out this part or permits issued under this part;

Examine and either approve, modify, or disapprove applications for permits, maps, bonds, mining and reclamation plans, revegetation plans, and after-use plans submitted by applicants;

Make investigations and inspections that are necessary to ensure compliance with this part, with the authority to enter at any time upon a suspected or affected area for investigations and inspections and the right of ingress and egress across intervening properties;

Employ and commission qualified individuals as surface mine reclamation personnel; provided, when properly qualified and commissioned, surface mine reclamation personnel shall enforce all laws, rules, permits, and orders administered by the department, including, but not limited to, authorization to serve process; and

Establish a process whereby a single set of forms and information, submitted in multiple copies to the division of water resources and the commissioner under § 59-8-106(a), shall contain sufficient mutually needed information to serve as a basic application for the permits issued by the division and the commissioner; provided, the evaluation of applications is made cooperatively, and decisions to grant or deny the permits are made simultaneously.

The commissioner may:

To the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, grant a continuation of an existing permit for a maximum of sixty (60) days in order for the operator to complete the mining phases of the operation;

Enter into contracts or other agreements for reclamation of sites pursuant to this chapter, or to otherwise further the purposes of this part;

In addition to the powers authorized to the commissioner under § 59-8-326, expend or cause to be expended money from the Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund, created by § 59-8-326, for purposes of this chapter; and

Permit water impoundments when the commissioner determines that the water impoundments are in compliance with this part.

The board shall:

Promulgate rules to effectuate this part. The rules may take proper account of mining conditions and practices in this state and differences in topography, geology, and soil conditions, and established use patterns of neighboring lands as recognized by local or state planning agencies;

Within ninety (90) days after the effective date of this part [see the Compiler's Notes], promulgate emergency rules that conform to the corresponding federal regulations promulgated under the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (30 U.S.C. § 1201, et seq.);

Within sixty (60) days of the promulgation, amendment, modification, repeal, or determination of invalidity of any federal regulation promulgated under the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (30 U.S.C. § 1201, et seq.), promulgate rules to conform the board's rules to the current federal regulation;

Use emergency rulemaking in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to promulgate any of the rules required by subdivisions (b)(1)(A)-(C). Prior to the expiration of rules promulgated as emergency rules, the board shall promulgate permanent rules in accordance with title 4, chapter 5, part 2; and

Unless otherwise specifically authorized by this part, not promulgate a rule under this subdivision (b)(1) that imposes a requirement that is more restrictive than, or inconsistent with, any existing federal regulation promulgated under the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977. In any year in which the board has not promulgated rules that are substantively similar to the corresponding federal regulations because a provision of this part is more stringent than the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, the board shall make a written report that identifies any state or federal law that conflicts with the pertinent state rules or federal regulations to the chair of the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate prior to January 1 of the immediately succeeding year;

Promulgate rules under subdivision (b)(1) for the establishment of standards for acceptable mining and reclamation of affected areas; provided, the rules are designed to achieve soil stabilization, control soil erosion, obliterate the scars of the mining operation, ensure quick revegetation, and ensure that the operation meets applicable soil and water quality standards;

To the extent permitted by federal law and regulations, promulgate rules for the establishment of a process whereby the commissioner may grant a continuation of an existing permit under subdivision (a)(2)(A); and

Hear appeals consistent with § 59-8-120 from mineral rights owners, permittees, operators, property owners, or other aggrieved persons who are or may be adversely affected by orders, determinations, rules, permit terms, or rulings of the commissioner that in any way affect surface coal mining and reclamation operations in this state.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-104. Additional powers of commissioner. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

In addition to the powers authorized to the commissioner under § 59-8-326, the commissioner may expend monies from the Tennessee surface mine reclamation fund, created by § 59-8-326, for the emergency restoration, reclamation, abatement, control, or prevention of adverse effects of surface coal mining practices, on eligible lands, if the commissioner finds that:

An emergency exists constituting a danger to the public health, safety, or general welfare; and

No other person or agency will act expeditiously to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effect of surface coal mining practices.

The commissioner may enter upon any land where an emergency as described in subsection (a) exists, and upon any other land, to have access to the land where the emergency exists; to restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects of surface coal mining practices; and to do all things necessary to protect the public health, safety, or general welfare.

An entry made under this subsection (b) is an exercise of the police power, and is not an act of condemnation of property nor of trespass.

The money expended for the commissioner's work and the benefits accruing to the land shall mitigate or offset any claim in or any action brought by any owner of any interest in the land for alleged damages by virtue of the entry. This subdivision (b)(3) does not create new rights of action or eliminate existing immunities.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

59-8-105. Coal exploration operations and activities. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

Coal exploration operations that substantially disturb the natural land surface shall be conducted in accordance with exploration rules promulgated by the board under § 59-8-103(b)(1).

The rules for coal exploration operations shall include:

A requirement that prior to conducting any coal exploration, a person shall file a notice of intention to explore with the commissioner, which shall include a description of the exploration area and the period of supposed exploration; and

A requirement for reclamation, in accordance with the performance standards in § 59-8-110, of all lands disturbed in exploration, including excavations, roads, and drill holes, and the removal of necessary facilities and equipment.

Coal exploration operations shall not begin until:

Twenty-one (21) days after the person files a notice of intention to explore with the commissioner; and

The person filing the notice of intention to explore files with the commissioner a performance bond in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) per acre disturbed by the coal exploration operations, payable to this state and conditioned upon the faithful performance of reclamation in accordance with the notice of intention and the performance standards in § 59-8-110. The performance bond shall be released immediately upon inspection and completion of initial reclamation in accordance with the notice of intention and the performance standards in § 59-8-110, without regard to the time or other requirements in § 59-8-115. If the notice of intention to explore is deficient, the department shall inform the person who filed the notice of the deficiency within twenty-one (21) days of the date that the notice was filed with the department.

Any person who conducts any coal exploration activities that substantially disturb the natural land surface in violation of this part is subject to the penalties in § 59-8-117.

No person shall remove more than twenty-five (25) tons of coal under the authority of exploration activities without obtaining a coal exploration permit from the commissioner pursuant to rules promulgated by the board under § 59-8-103(b)(1).

Information submitted to the department and the commissioner pursuant to this section as confidential trade secrets or privileged commercial or financial information, which relates to the competitive rights of the person or entity intended to explore the described area, shall not be available for public examination under title 10, chapter 7.

The commissioner shall notify a person who files a notice of intention to explore with the department that the proposed exploration shall not occur if the commissioner makes a written finding of fact and delivers the finding to the person who filed the notice of intention to explore during the twenty-one-day period after the notice of intention to explore is filed with the department that the proposed exploration will either:

Be conducted on an environmentally fragile area and cause significant environmental harm; or

Cause irreparable environmental harm.

If the commissioner does not permit exploration under subdivision (e)(1), the person filing the notice of intention to explore shall have the right to appeal the commissioner's decision to the board and the board shall hold a hearing within thirty (30) days of receipt of the appeal.

The commissioner shall bear the burden of proof at an appeal hearing.

The board shall render its decision concerning an appeal within ten (10) days of the hearing.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

59-8-106. Permits for surface coal mining and reclamation activities. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

No person shall engage in surface coal mining and reclamation operations without having first obtained from the commissioner a permit for each surface mine. All permits issued under this part shall be issued for a term not to exceed five (5) years; however, if the applicant demonstrates that a specified longer term is reasonably needed to allow the applicant to obtain necessary financing for equipment and the opening of the operation, and if the application is full and complete for a specified longer term, the commissioner may issue a permit for the longer term. The commissioner shall issue a permit for a term longer than five (5) years only if the requirements of this part are satisfied, and only upon the submission by the applicant and approval by the commissioner of a bond, permit fee, and acreage fees for all acres permitted, a mining and reclamation plan, and any other information required by this part.

A successor in interest to a permittee who submits a complete application for a new permit within thirty (30) days of succeeding to the interest, and who is able to obtain the bond coverage of the original permittee may, with the written approval of the commissioner, continue using the surface mining and reclamation plan of the original permittee until the successor's application for a new permit and plan is granted or denied, not to exceed the termination date of the original permit.

The issuance of permits shall be subject to payment of the fee, posting the performance bond required by this part, and submission to the department of any information that is necessary to assure compliance with this part as prescribed in the rules promulgated by the board under § 59-8-103(b)(1).

Information pertaining to coal seams, test borings, core samplings, or soil samples required by this section shall be made available to any person with an interest that is or may be adversely affected; however, information that pertains only to the analysis of the chemical and physical properties of the coal, except that information regarding any mineral or elemental content, which is potentially toxic in the environment, shall be kept confidential and not made a matter of public record under title 10, chapter 7.

Each applicant for a surface coal mining and reclamation operation permit shall submit a reclamation plan that meets the requirements of § 59-8-109, to the commissioner as part of the permit application. The board shall specify in rules promulgated under § 59-8-103(b)(1), the requirements for the contents, processing, and publication of an application.

Within five (5) days of submitting an application for a coal surface mining permit to the commissioner, the applicant shall file a complete copy of the application for public inspection with the register of deeds of the county, or an appropriate public office approved by the commissioner, in the locality where the mining is proposed to occur, except for information pertaining to the coal itself.

Each applicant for a coal surface mining and reclamation permit shall submit, as part of the permit application, a blasting plan that outlines the procedures and standards by which the applicant will meet the requirements of this part.

Each applicant for a coal surface mining permit shall submit, as part of the permit application, a certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state, certifying that the applicant has a public liability insurance policy in force for the surface mining and reclamation operation for which the permit is sought, or evidence that the applicant is self-insured. The public liability insurance policy shall provide for personal injury and property damage protection in an amount adequate to compensate any persons damaged as a result of surface mining and reclamation operations, including the use of explosives. The policy shall be maintained in full force and effect during the terms of the permit or any renewal period, including the length of all reclamation operations.

The holder of a valid permit issued under this part may apply to continue the operation beyond the original permit expiration date by submitting a renewal application at least one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the expiration date of the permit. The time length of a permit renewal shall not exceed the time length of the original permit.

In any case when the private mineral estate has been severed from the private surface estate, the applicant for a permit shall submit one (1) of the following to the commissioner:

The written consent of the surface owner to the extraction of coal by surface mining methods;

A copy of a conveyance that expressly grants or reserves the right to extract coal by surface mining methods; or

If the conveyance does not expressly grant the right to extract coal by surface mining methods, the surface-subsurface legal relationship shall be determined in accordance with the laws of this state. Nothing in this part authorizes the commissioner or board to adjudicate property right disputes.

Any operator who is a permittee may subcontract any part, or all, of the mining of the lands covered by the permit to a subcontractor if the subcontractor is not in violation of this part with regard to the subcontractor's own operations, or if the subcontractor submits proof that any violation by the subcontractor has been corrected or is in the process of being corrected to the satisfaction of the commissioner, department, or agency that has jurisdiction over the violation.

If, after an opportunity for a hearing, the commissioner makes a finding that the subcontractor controls or has controlled mining operations with a demonstrated pattern of knowing violations of this part of a nature and duration, or with resulting irreparable damage to the environment that indicates an intent not to comply with this part, the operator shall not subcontract any part of the mining operation to the subcontractor.

An applicant for a permit shall publish an advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the proposed site, which identifies the ownership, the exact location, and boundaries of the proposed site specifically enough that the proposed operation can be readily located by nearby residents, and the location of the place where the application is available for public inspection. The advertisement shall be published at least once a week for four (4) successive weeks after the filing of an administratively complete application and shall appear in the form and contain the information that is required by the rules promulgated by the board under § 59-8-103(b)(1).

The board may, by rules promulgated under § 59-8-103(b)(1), set criteria for obtaining a permit exemption for the following:

Extraction of coal as an incidental part of federal, state, or local government financed highway or other construction; or

Construction operations involving less than one (1) acre in disturbance where coal removal is incidental to the purpose of the construction and not inconsistent with this part.

The commissioner shall make an on-the-ground inspection of a proposed affected area before a new permit is issued; however, an inspection shall not be required for the renewal of any permit.

The applicant shall submit to the commissioner the name, permanent address, and any temporary address to be used in connection with the operation covered by the permit, in addition to the telephone number of any subcontractor to be used in the mining operation.

The permit area shall be readily identifiable by appropriate markers on the site.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

59-8-107. Permit and acreage fees. [Contingent effective date, see Compiler's Notes.]

Subject to the exemptions in subsection (b), every application for a surface coal mining and reclamation operation permit or an underground coal mining permit shall be accompanied by a basic application fee and an acreage fee.

The basic application fee shall be:

For a new permit, three thousand eight hundred fifty dollars ($3,850);

For a permit revision that proposes significant alterations, two thousand dollars ($2,000);

For a permit revision that does not propose significant alterations, seven hundred fifty dollars ($750);

For a permit renewal, five hundred dollars ($500);

For a successor's permit, three hundred fifty dollars ($350); and

For an exploration permit, one thousand dollars ($1,000).

The acreage fee shall be paid annually as prescribed in rules promulgated by the board under § 59-8-103(b)(1). The amount of the acreage fee shall be:

For a site that has not been reclaimed, forty dollars ($40.00) per permitted acre; and

For a site that has been reclaimed, twenty dollars ($20.00) per permitted acre.

The fee for an amendment of a coal mining permit shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

The fee for an amendment of a coal exploration permit shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

If the amendment increases the acreage permitted, the acreage fee for the increase in acreage shall be paid at the time of application.

If the amendment decreases the acreage permitted, the refund for the acreage deleted shall be paid by this state to the applicant when the amendment is granted.

Local governments and state agencies are exempt from permit and acreage fees.

All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the coal mining protection fund, created in § 59-8-132.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect eight (8) months immediately following the receipt of notification from the secretary of the interior that this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act, which enacted this part, §§59-8-101—59-8-134, shall take effect upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]